Mississippi, session 2026, SB2887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Behavioral Health and Substance Use Disorder Triage Act." SECTION 2. (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Substance use disorder and behavioral health conditions are chronic medical conditions requiring timely, clinically appropriate intervention; (b)  Inconsistent and subjective placement decisions result in inappropriate levels of care, fragmented treatment, increased emergency department utilization, higher overdose risks and an overall increase in the total cost of care; (c)  The state lacks a standardized statewide mechanism to ensure that individuals are triaged to the correct level of treatment based on objective clinical data; and (d)  Nationally recognized clinical criteria are widely accepted as best practices for determining appropriate levels of care and are necessary for systemic stability. (2)  The purpose of this act is to: (a)  Mandate the use of objective evidence-based placement criteria across all providers and payors; (b)  Ensure individuals receive care at the appropriate level of intensity to maximize recovery; and (c)  Improve continuity of care and quality outcomes while containing costs through the reduction of preventable overdoses, emergency department visits and hospitalizations. SECTION 3. For the purposes of this act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "ASAM Criteria" means the clinical criteria developed by the American Society of Addiction Medicine for assessing and placing in care individuals with substance use disorders. (b)  "Behavioral health services" means mental health assessment and treatment services not primarily related to a substance use disorder. (c)  "Substance use disorder services" means the full continuum of care, including prevention assessment, detoxification, residential treatment, partial hospitalization, intensive outpatient and recovery support. (d) "Provider" means any licensed or certified entity or individual delivering behavioral health or substance use disorder services in the state. (e)  "Payor" includes Medicaid-managed care organizations, commercial insurers and any state-regulated health benefit plan. SECTION 4. (1)  All providers delivering substance use disorder services shall utilize the ASAM Criteria to conduct initial clinical assessments, determine levels of care, support transitions and document medical necessity. (2)  Placement decisions shall be based on objective clinical findings and shall not be dictated by provider availability, bed capacity, financial considerations or nonclinical preferences. SECTION 5. (1)  For individuals seeking treatment for behavioral health conditions without a diagnosed substance use disorder, providers shall utilize nationally-recognized, evidence-based psychiatric level-of-care criteria. (2)  Acceptable frameworks include: (a)  Level of Care Utilization System ("LOCUS") for adults; (b)  CALOCUS-CASII for children and adolescents; and (c)  Other state-approved nationally recognized psychiatric placement frameworks. (3)  Substance use disorder-specific criteria, including ASAM, shall not be applied to individuals whose primary diagnosis is a behavioral health condition without a co-occurring substance use disorder. SECTION 6. For individuals presenting with both behavioral health and substance use disorders, providers shall: (a)  Utilize ASAM Criteria to assess substance use disorder severity; (b)  Utilize appropriate behavioral health criteria to assess psychiatric acuity; and (c)  Ensure placement decisions reflect the highest level of clinical need, identified through the objective assessment of both conditions. SECTION 7. (1)  This act shall apply to all services reimbursed under Medicaid-managed care organizations, commercial insurance and state-regulated health benefit plans. (2)  Payors are required to align their utilization management, prior authorization and care coordination policies with the criteria-based determinations established in Sections 3 and 4 of this act. SECTION 8. (1)  Providers and payors shall utilize the mandated clinical criteria to support seamless transitions between levels of care. (2)  The goal of such coordination is to eliminate treatment gaps that increase the risk of relapse or overdose. SECTION 9. (1)  The Legislature recognizes that inappropriate triage results in avoidable expenditures, including emergency department utilization, hospital admissions, crisis stabilization and incarceration-related healthcare costs. (2)  Evidence-based clinical triage is a proven method for reducing unnecessary utilization and lowering the total cost of care. (3)  This act does not mandate the creation of new benefits but ensures existing services are used efficiently, resulting in cost avoidance rather than new spending. SECTION 10. On or before January 1, 2027, the designated state agency shall establish implementation guidance, monitor provider and payor compliance, and align quality reporting standards with this act. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2027.